Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297H.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Allocation of revenues. (a) Of the amounts remitted under this chapter, 70 percent must be credited to the environmental fund established in section 16A.531, subdivision 1. (b) In addition to the amounts credited to the environmental fund in paragraph (a), deleted text begin in fiscal year 2024 and later, three percent of the amounts remitted under this chapterdeleted text end new text begin the following amountsnew text end shall be deposited into the resource management account in the environmental fundnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) in fiscal year 2026, seven percent of the amounts remitted under this chapter; new text end new text begin (2) in fiscal year 2027, 20 percent of the amounts remitted under this chapter; and new text end new text begin (3) in fiscal year 2028 and later, 30 percent of the amounts remitted under this chapternew text end . (c) The remaindernew text begin , through fiscal year 2027,new text end must be deposited into the general fund. (d) deleted text begin Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and annually thereafter,deleted text end The money deposited in the resource management account in the environmental fund under paragraph (b) is appropriated to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for distribution to counties under section 115A.557, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (7) and (9) to (11). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end